test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_piegga_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# ok

Tests:

  
  Noun - pieggâ:
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Nom: pieggâ
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Gen: piegâ
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Acc: piegâ
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Ill: piegân
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Loc: piegâst
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Com: pieggáin
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Abe: piegâttáá
    pieggâ+N+Ess: pieggân
    pieggâ+N+Par: pieggâd
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Nom: piegah
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Gen: [piegâi, piegâi]
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Acc: piegâid
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Ill: pieggáid
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Loc: piegâin
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Com: piegâiguin
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Abe: piegâittáá
  
